Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.420

Grant of authority.

When entering or modifying a court order, the court has the authority to allow or not allow a person to relocate the child.

[ 2000 c 21 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.